Illinois, session 104th, SB2246.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-145 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/9-145)7    Sec. 9-145. Statutory level of assessment.      8    (a) Except in counties with more than 200,000 inhabitants 9which classify property for purposes of taxation, property 10shall be valued as follows: 11        (1) (a) Each tract or lot of property shall be valued 12    at 33 1/3% of its fair cash value. 13        (2) (b) Each taxable leasehold estate shall be valued 14    at 33 1/3% of its fair cash value. 15        (3) (c) Each building or structure which is located on 16    the right of way of any canal, railroad or other company 17    leased or granted to another company or person for a term 18    of years, shall be valued at 33 1/3% of its fair cash 19    value. 20        (4) (d) Any property on which there is a coal or other 21    mine, or stone or other quarry, shall be valued at 33 1/3% 22    of its fair cash value. Oil, gas and other minerals, 23    except coal, shall have value and be assessed separately   SB2246- 2 -LRB104 08934 HLH 18989 b1    at 33 1/3% of the fair cash value of such oil, gas and 2    other minerals. Coal shall be assessed separately at 33 3    1/3% of the coal reserve economic value, as provided in 4    Sections 10-170 through 10-200. 5        (5) (e) In the assessment of property encumbered by 6    public easement, any depreciation occasioned by such 7    easement shall be deducted in the valuation of such 8    property. Any property dedicated as a nature preserve or 9    as a nature preserve buffer under the Illinois Natural 10    Areas Preservation Act, for the purposes of this 11    paragraph, is encumbered by a public easement and shall be 12    depreciated for assessment purposes to a level at which 13    its valuation shall be $1 per acre or portion thereof.14    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, beginning 15with the 2026 assessment year, in all counties, the assessed 16value of residential property in any general assessment year 17shall not exceed the assessed value of the property in the last 18general assessment year multiplied by one plus the percentage 19change in the Consumer Price Index during the 12-month 20calendar year immediately preceding the general assessment 21year for which the reassessment is conducted. 22    The limitation under this subsection (b) does not apply if 23the increase in assessment is attributable to an addition, 24improvement, or modification to the property or if the 25property is sold. 26    As used in this Section, "Consumer Price Index" means the   SB2246- 3 -LRB104 08934 HLH 18989 b1index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 2United States Department of Labor that measures the average 3change in prices of goods and services purchased by all urban 4consumers, United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 5100. 6    This subsection (b) is a denial and limitation under 7subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 8Constitution on the power of home rule units to tax. 9    (c) This Section is subject to and modified by Sections 1010-110 through 10-140 and 11-5 through 11-65.11(Source: P.A. 91-497, eff. 1-1-00.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.